Utah statutes.
63G-6a-2308.   Exemption.

(1)  This part does not apply to:

(a)  a county, a municipality, a local district, a special service district, a conservation district, or a political subdivision created under Title 11, Chapter 13, Interlocal Cooperation Act; or

(b)  as it relates to a procurement by, or a contract with, a person described in Subsection (1)(a):

(i)  a procurement participant, interested person, or contract administrator of a person described in Subsection (1)(a); or

(ii)  a family member of a person described in Subsection (1)(b)(i).

(2)  A person described in Subsection (1) is, as it is applicable to the person, required to comply with:

(a)  Title 67, Chapter 16, Utah Public Officers' and Employees' Ethics Act;

(b)  Section 76-8-105; and

(c)  all other applicable provisions of law.



Enacted by Chapter 445, 2013 General Session

